Texas, session 892, HB109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 45.003(b-1), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (b-1)  The ballot proposition under Subsection (b) must include the following statement in bold and size 42 font: "THIS IS A PROPERTY TAX INCREASE." SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to an election ordered on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.